Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-569
Notice; defective; effect.

In any and every case where a notice is provided for in sections 46-501 to 46-573, if the court finds for any reason that due notice was not given, the court shall not thereby lose jurisdiction, and the proceeding in question shall not thereby be void or be abated, but the court shall in that case order due notice to be given, and shall continue the hearing until such time as notice shall be properly given, and thereupon shall proceed as though notice had been properly given in the first instance.

Laws 1947, c. 173, § 35, p. 557.